Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LOCAL ROAD IMPROVEMENT PLANNING ACTIVITIES.new text end new text begin (a) $2,900,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the activities stated in paragraph (b) to prepare for a new river crossing and future improvements to road, transportation, and other infrastructure in the area bounded by and inclusive of marked Trunk Highway 101, U.S. Highway 10, U.S. Highway 169, marked Trunk Highway 610, and marked Interstate Highway 94. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation includes money for the following activities: new text end new text begin (1) planning and evaluation, environmental analysis, and design necessary for the river crossing and future road, transportation, and other infrastructure improvements in the project area; new text end new text begin (2) completion of Tier I and environmental impact statements required for the project area; and new text end new text begin (3) assessment of the impact of improvements to highways and roads in the project area on other local infrastructure systems, including but not limited to water, wastewater, and stormwater systems. new text end new text begin (c) This appropriation does not require a contribution of nonstate money. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end